North Carolina statutes. Chapter 97. Workers’ Compensation Act.
Article 1. Workers’ Compensation Act.
§ 97-25.
Medical treatment and supplies.

Medical compensation shall be provided by the employer.

Upon the written request of the employee to the employer, the employer may agree to authorize and pay for a second opinion examination with a duly qualified physician licensed to practice in North Carolina, or licensed in another state if agreed to by the parties or ordered by the Commission. If, within 14 calendar days of the receipt of the written request, the request is denied or the parties, in good faith, are unable to agree upon a health care provider to perform a second opinion examination, the employee may request that the Industrial Commission order a second opinion examination. The expense thereof shall be borne by the employer upon the same terms and conditions as provided in this section for medical compensation.

Provided, however, if the employee so desires, an injured employee may select a health care provider of the employee’s own choosing to attend, prescribe, and assume the care and charge of the employee’s case subject to the approval of the Industrial Commission. In addition, in case of a controversy arising between the employer and the employee, the Industrial Commission may order necessary treatment. In order for the Commission to grant an employee’s request to change treatment or health care provider, the employee must show by a preponderance of the evidence that the change is reasonably necessary to effect a cure, provide relief, or lessen the period of disability. When deciding whether to grant an employee’s request to change treatment or health care provider, the Commission may disregard or give less weight to the opinion of a health care provider from whom the employee sought evaluation, diagnosis, or treatment before the employee first requested authorization in writing from the employer, insurer, or Commission.

The refusal of the employee to accept any medical compensation when ordered by the Industrial Commission shall bar the employee from further compensation until such refusal ceases, and no compensation shall at any time be paid for the period of suspension unless in the opinion of the Industrial Commission the circumstances justified the refusal. Any order issued by the Commission suspending compensation pursuant to

G.S. 97-18.1

shall specify what action the employee should take to end the suspension and reinstate the compensation.

If in an emergency on account of the employer’s failure to provide medical compensation, a physician other than provided by the employer is called to treat the injured employee, the reasonable cost of such service shall be paid by the employer if so ordered by the Industrial Commission.

In claims subject to G.S. 97-18(b) and (d), a party may file a motion as set forth in this subsection regarding a request for medical compensation or a dispute involving medical issues. The nonmoving party shall have the right to contest the motion. Motions and responses shall be submitted contemporaneously via electronic means to the Commission and to the opposing party or the opposing party’s attorney, as follows:

A party may file a motion with the Executive Secretary for an administrative ruling regarding a request for medical compensation or a dispute involving medical issues. The motion shall be decided administratively pursuant to rules governing motions practices in contested cases. The Commission shall decide the motion within 30 days of the filing of the motion unless an extension of time to respond to the motion has been granted for good cause shown. Either party may file a motion for reconsideration of the administrative order with the Executive Secretary. Either party may request an expedited formal hearing pursuant to

G.S. 97-84

and subdivision (2) of this subsection to appeal the decision of the Executive Secretary approving or denying the original motion or the motion for reconsideration. Within five days of the filing of a request for an expedited formal hearing pursuant to

G.S. 97-84

and subdivision (2) of this subsection to appeal the decision of the Executive Secretary, the Commission shall assign a Deputy Commissioner to conduct the formal hearing. The decision shall not be stayed during the pendency of an appeal pursuant to G.S. 97-84 and subdivision (2) of this subsection except under those circumstances set out in subdivision (4) of this subsection. A motion to stay shall be filed with the Deputy Commissioner scheduled to conduct the formal hearing pursuant to G.S. 97-84. Either party may appeal the decision of the Deputy Commissioner pursuant to G.S. 97-84 to the Full Commission pursuant to

G.S. 97-85

. The decision of the Deputy Commissioner shall not be stayed during the pendency of an appeal except under those circumstances set out in subdivision (4) of this subsection. A motion to stay the decision of the Deputy Commissioner pursuant to G.S. 97-84 shall be directed to the Chair of the Commission. The Full Commission shall render a decision on the appeal of the Deputy Commissioner’s decision on the motion within 60 days of the filing of the notice of appeal.

In lieu of filing a motion with the Executive Secretary for an administrative ruling pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, when appealing a ruling made pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection or when appealing an administrative ruling of the Chief Deputy or the Chief Deputy’s designee on an emergency motion, a party may request a full evidentiary hearing pursuant to G.S. 97-84 on an expedited basis, limited to a request for medical compensation or a dispute involving medical issues, by filing a motion with the Office of the Chief Deputy Commissioner. The case will not be ordered into mediation based upon a party’s request for hearing on the motion or appeal under this subdivision, except upon the consent of the parties. The Commission shall set the date of the expedited hearing, which shall be held within 30 days of the filing of the motion or appeal and shall notify the parties of the time and place of the hearing on the motion or appeal. Upon request, the Commission may order expedited discovery. The record shall be closed within 60 days of the filing of the motion, or in the case of an appeal pursuant to subdivisions (1) and (3) of this subsection, within 60 days of the filing of the appeal, unless the parties agree otherwise or the Commission so orders. Transcripts of depositions shall be expedited if necessary and paid pursuant to rules promulgated by the Commission related to depositions and shall be submitted electronically to the Commission. The Commission shall decide the issue in dispute and make findings of fact based upon the preponderance of the evidence in view of the entire record. The award, together with a statement of the findings of fact, rulings of law, and other matters pertinent to the questions at issue shall be filed with the record of the proceedings within 15 days of the close of the hearing record, and a copy of the award shall immediately be sent to the parties. Either party may appeal the decision of the Deputy Commissioner pursuant to G.S. 97-84 to the Full Commission pursuant to

G.S. 97-85

. The decision of the Deputy Commissioner pursuant to G.S. 97-84 shall not be stayed during the pendency of an appeal except under those circumstances set out in subdivision (4) of this subsection. A motion to stay the decision of the Deputy Commissioner pursuant to G.S. 97-84 shall be directed to the Chair of the Commission. The Full Commission shall render a decision on the appeal of the Deputy Commissioner’s decision on the motion within 60 days of the filing of the notice of appeal.

An emergency medical motion filed by either party shall be filed with the Office of the Chief Deputy Commissioner. The Chief Deputy or Chief Deputy’s designee shall rule on the motion within five days of receipt unless the Chief Deputy or Chief Deputy’s designee determines that the motion is not an emergency, in which case the motion shall be referred to the Executive Secretary for an administrative ruling pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection. Motions requesting emergency medical relief shall contain all of the following:

An explanation of the medical diagnosis and treatment recommendation of the health care provider that requires emergency attention.

A specific statement detailing the time-sensitive nature of the request to include relevant dates and the potential for adverse consequences to the movant if the recommended relief is not provided emergently.

An explanation of opinions known and in the possession of the movant of additional medical or other relevant experts, independent medical examiners, and second opinion examiners.

Documentation known and in the possession of the movant in support of the request, including relevant medical records.

A representation that informal means of resolving the issue have been attempted.

Either party may appeal the decision of the Chief Deputy or the Chief Deputy’s designee on the emergency motion by requesting an expedited formal hearing pursuant to G.S. 97-84 and subdivision (2) of this subsection to appeal the administrative decision of the Chief Deputy or the Chief Deputy’s designee on the emergency motion. Within five days of the filing of a request for an expedited formal hearing pursuant to G.S. 97-84 and subdivision (2) of this subsection, the Commission shall assign a Deputy Commissioner to conduct the formal hearing. The decision of the Chief Deputy or the Chief Deputy’s designee shall not be stayed during the pendency of an appeal of the administrative decision except under those circumstances set out in subdivision (4) of this subsection. Any motion to stay shall be filed with the Deputy Commissioner scheduled to conduct the expedited formal hearing pursuant to G.S. 97-84 and subdivision (2) of this subsection. Either party may appeal the decision of the Deputy Commissioner pursuant to G.S. 97-84 to the Full Commission pursuant to G.S. 97-85. If so, the decision of the Deputy Commissioner shall not be stayed during the pendency of an appeal except under those circumstances set out in subdivision (4) of this subsection. Any motion to stay the decision of the Deputy Commissioner pursuant to G.S. 97-84 shall be directed to the Chair of the Commission. The Full Commission shall render a decision on the appeal of the Deputy Commissioner’s decision on the motion within 60 days of the filing of the notice of appeal.

The Commission shall consider, among other factors, all of the following when determining whether to grant a motion to stay filed pursuant to this subsection:

Whether there would be immediate and irreparable injury, harm, loss, or damage to either party.

The nature and cost of the medical relief sought.

The risk for further injury or disability to the employee inherent in the treatment or its delay.

Whether it has been recommended by an authorized physician.

Whether alternative therapeutic modalities are available and reasonable.

If the Commission determines that any party has acted unreasonably by initiating or objecting to a motion filed pursuant to this section, the Commission may assess costs associated with any proceeding, including any reasonable attorneys’ fees and deposition costs, against the offending party.

, (h)Repealed by Session Laws 2014-77, s. 4, effective July 22, 2014.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 25; 1931, c. 274, s. 4; 1933, c. 506; 1955, c. 1026, s. 2; 1973, c. 520, s. 1; 1991, c. 703, s. 3; 1997-308, s. 1; 1999-150, s. 1; 2005-448, s. 6.2; 2011-287, s. 6; 2013-294, s. 4; 2014-77, s. 4; 2017-102, s. 15.

Cross References.

As to independent suit by physician against employee to recover for medical services, see note to

G.S. 97-90

.

§ 97-25.1.
Limitation of duration of medical compensation.

The right to medical compensation shall terminate two years after the employer’s last payment of medical or indemnity compensation unless, prior to the expiration of this period, either: (i) the employee files with the Commission an application for additional medical compensation which is thereafter approved by the Commission, or (ii) the Commission on its own motion orders additional medical compensation. If the Commission determines that there is a substantial risk of the necessity of future medical compensation, the Commission shall provide by order for payment of future necessary medical compensation.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 2.5.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey, “The North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act of 1994: A Step in the Direction of Restoring Balance,” see 73 N.C.L. Rev. 2502 (1995).

§ 97-25.2.
Managed care organizations.

The requirements of

G.S. 97-25

may be satisfied by contracting with a managed care organization. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, if an employer or carrier contracts with a managed care organization for medical services pursuant to this Article, those employees who are covered by the contract with the managed care organization shall receive medical services for a condition for which the employer has accepted liability or authorized treatment under this Article in the manner prescribed by the contract and in accordance with the managed care organization’s certificate of authority; provided that the contract complies with rules adopted by the Commission, consistent with this Article, governing managed care organizations. An employee must exhaust all dispute resolution procedures of a managed care organization before applying to the Commission for review of any issue related to medical services compensable under this Article. Once application to the Commission has been made, the employee shall be entitled to an examination by a duly qualified physician or surgeon in the same manner as provided by

G.S. 97-27

.

If an employee’s medical services are provided through a managed care organization pursuant to this section, subject to the rules of the managed care organization, the employee shall select the attending physician from those physicians who are members of the managed care organization’s panel, and may subsequently change attending physicians once within the group of physicians who are members of the managed care organization’s panel without approval from the employer or insurer. Additional changes in the attending physician or any change to a physician or examination by a physician not a member of the insurer’s managed care organization’s panel shall only be made pursuant to the organization’s contract or upon reasonable grounds by order of the Commission.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 2.1.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey, “The North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act of 1994: A Step in the Direction of Restoring Balance,” see 73 N.C.L. Rev. 2502 (1995).

For comment, “Managed Care Organizations in North Carolina: Tort Liability Theories and Defenses,” see 23 N.C. Cent. L.J. 58 (1997).

§ 97-25.3.
Preauthorization.

An insurer may require preauthorization for inpatient admission to a hospital, inpatient admission to a treatment center, and inpatient or outpatient surgery. The insurer’s preauthorization requirement must adhere to the following standards:

The insurer may require no more than 10 days advance notice of the inpatient admission or surgery.

The insurer must respond to a request for preauthorization within two business days of the request.

The insurer shall review the need for the inpatient admission or surgery and may require the employee to submit to an independent medical examination as provided in G.S. 97-27(a). This examination must be completed and the insurer must make its determination on the request for preauthorization within seven days of the date of the request unless this time is extended by the Commission for good cause.

The insurer shall document its review findings and determination in writing and shall provide a copy of the findings and determination to the employee and the employee’s attending physician, and, if applicable, to the hospital or treatment center.

The insurer shall authorize the inpatient admission or surgery when it requires the employee to submit to a medical examination as provided in G.S. 97-27(a) and the examining physician concurs with the original recommendation for the inpatient admission or surgery. The insurer shall also authorize the inpatient admission or surgery when the employee obtains a second opinion from a physician approved by the insurer or the Commission, and the second physician concurs with the original recommendation for the inpatient admission or surgery. However, the insurer shall not be required by this subdivision to authorize the inpatient admission or surgery if it denies liability under this Article for the particular medical condition for which the services are sought.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the insurer may reduce its reimbursement of the provider’s eligible charges under this Article by up to fifty percent (50%) if the insurer has notified the provider in writing of its preauthorization requirement and the provider failed to timely obtain preauthorization. The employee shall not be liable for the balance of the charges.

The insurer shall adhere to all other procedures for preauthorization prescribed by the Commission.

An insurer may not impose a preauthorization requirement for the following:

Emergency services;

Services rendered in the diagnosis or treatment of an injury or illness for which the insurer has not admitted liability or authorized payment for treatment pursuant to this Article; and

Services rendered in the diagnosis and treatment of a specific medical condition for which the insurer has not admitted liability or authorized payment for treatment although the insurer admits the employee has suffered a compensable injury or illness.

The Commission may, upon reasonable grounds, upon the request of the employee or provider, authorize treatment for which preauthorization is otherwise required by this section but was not obtained if the Commission determines that the treatment is or was reasonably required to effect a cure or give relief.

The Commission may adopt procedures governing the use of preauthorization requirements and expeditious review of preauthorization denials.

A managed care organization may impose preauthorization requirements consistent with the provisions of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes.

A provider that refuses to treat an employee for other than an emergency medical condition because preauthorization has not been obtained shall be immune from liability in any civil action for the refusal to treat the employee because of lack of preauthorization.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 2.2.

§ 97-25.4.
Utilization guidelines for medical treatment.

The Commission may adopt utilization rules and guidelines, consistent with this Article, for medical care and medical rehabilitation services, other than those services provided by managed care organizations pursuant to

G.S. 97-25.2

, including, but not limited to, necessary palliative care, physical therapy treatment, psychological therapy, chiropractic services, medical rehabilitation services, and attendant care. The Commission’s rules and guidelines shall ensure that injured employees are provided the services and care intended by this Article and that medical costs are adequately contained. In developing the rules and guidelines, the Commission may consider, among other factors, the practice guidelines adopted by the boards and associations representing medical and rehabilitation professionals.

Palliative care rules or guidelines adopted by the Commission may require that the provider (i) supply to the employer a treatment plan, including a schedule of measurable objectives, a projected termination date for treatment, and an estimated cost of services, and (ii) obtain preauthorization from the employer, not inconsistent with the provisions of

G.S. 97-25.3

.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 2.4.

§ 97-25.5.
Utilization guidelines for vocational and other rehabilitation.

The Commission may adopt utilization rules and guidelines, consistent with this Article, for vocational rehabilitation services and other types of rehabilitation services. In developing the rules and guidelines, the Commission may consider, among other factors, the practice and treatment guidelines adopted by professional rehabilitation associations and organizations.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 2.4.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey, “The North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act of 1994: A Step in the Direction of Restoring Balance,” see 73 N.C.L. Rev. 2502 (1995).

§ 97-25.6.
Reasonable access to medical information.

Notwithstanding any provision of

G.S. 8-53

to the contrary, and because discovery is limited pursuant to

G.S. 97-80

, it is the policy of this State to protect the employee’s right to a confidential physician-patient relationship while allowing the parties to have reasonable access to all relevant medical information, including medical records, reports, and information necessary to the fair and swift administration and resolution of workers’ compensation claims, while limiting unnecessary communications with and administrative requests to health care providers.

As used in this section, “relevant medical information” means any medical record, report, or information that is any of the following:

Restricted to the particular evaluation, diagnosis, or treatment of the injury or disease for which compensation, including medical compensation, is sought.

Reasonably related to the injury or disease for which the employee claims compensation.

Related to an assessment of the employee’s ability to return to work as a result of the particular injury or disease.

Relevant medical information shall be requested and provided subject to the following provisions:

Medical records. — An employer is entitled, without the express authorization of the employee, to obtain the employee’s medical records containing relevant medical information from the employee’s health care providers. In a claim in which the employer is not paying medical compensation to a health care provider from whom the medical records are sought, or in a claim denied pursuant to G.S. 97-18(c), the employer shall provide the employee with contemporaneous written notice of the request for medical records. Upon the request of the employee, the employer shall provide the employee with a copy of any records received in response to this request within 30 days of its receipt by the employer.

Written communications with health care providers. — An employer may communicate with the employee’s authorized health care provider in writing, without the express authorization of the employee, to obtain relevant medical information not available in the employee’s medical records. The employer shall provide the employee with contemporaneous written notice of the written communication. The employer may request the following additional information:

The diagnosis of the employee’s condition.

The appropriate course of treatment.

The anticipated time that the employee will be out of work.

The relationship, if any, of the employee’s condition to the employment.

Work restrictions resulting from the condition, including whether the employee is able to return to the employee’s employment with the employer of injury as provided in an attached job description.

The kind of work for which the employee may be eligible.

The anticipated time the employee will be restricted.

Any permanent impairment as a result of the condition.

The employer shall provide a copy of the health care provider’s response to the employee within 10 business days of its receipt by the employer.

Oral communications with health care providers. — An employer may communicate with the employee’s authorized health care provider by oral communication to obtain relevant medical information not contained in the employee’s medical records, not available through written communication, and not otherwise available to the employer, subject to the following:

The employer must give the employee prior notice of the purpose of the intended oral communication and an opportunity for the employee to participate in the oral communication at a mutually convenient time for the employer, employee, and health care provider.

The employer shall provide the employee with a summary of the communication with the health care provider within 10 business days of any oral communication in which the employee did not participate.

Additional Information Submitted by the Employer. — Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, an employer may submit additional relevant medical information not already contained in the employee’s medical records to the employee’s authorized health care provider and may communicate in writing with the health care provider about the additional information in accordance with the following procedure:

The employer shall first notify the employee in writing that the employer intends to communicate additional information about the employee to the employee’s health care provider. The notice shall include the employer’s proposed written communication to the health care provider and the additional information to be submitted.

The employee shall have 10 business days from the postmark or verifiable facsimile or electronic mail either to consent or object to the employer’s proposed written communication.

Upon consent of the employee or in the absence of the employee’s timely objection, the employer may submit the additional information directly to the health care provider.

Upon making a timely objection, the employee may request a protective order to prevent the written communication, in which case the employer shall refrain from communicating with the health care provider until the Commission has ruled upon the employee’s request. If the employee does not file with the Industrial Commission a request for a protective order within the time period set forth in subdivision (2) of subsection (d) of this section, the employer may submit the additional information directly to the health care provider. In deciding whether to allow the submission of additional information to the health care provider, in part or in whole, the Commission shall determine whether the proposed written communication and additional information are pertinent to and necessary for the fair and swift administration and resolution of the workers’ compensation claim and whether there is an alternative method to discover the information. If the Industrial Commission determines that any party has acted unreasonably by initiating or objecting to the submission of additional information to the health care provider, the Commission may assess costs associated with any proceeding, including reasonable attorneys’ fees and deposition costs, against the offending party.

Any medical records or reports that reflect evaluation, diagnosis, or treatment of the particular injury or disease for which compensation is sought or are reasonably related to the injury or disease for which the employee seeks compensation that are in the possession of a party shall be furnished to the requesting party by the opposing party when requested in writing, except for records or reports generated by a retained expert.

Upon motion by an employee or the health care provider from whom medical records, reports, or information are sought, or with whom oral communication is sought, or upon its own motion, for good cause shown, the Commission may make any order which justice requires to protect an employee, health care provider, or other person from unreasonable annoyance, embarrassment, oppression, or undue burden or expense.

Other forms of communication with a health care provider may be authorized by any of the following:

A valid written authorization voluntarily given and signed by the employee.

An agreement of the parties.

An order of the Industrial Commission issued upon a showing that the information sought is necessary for the administration of the employee’s claim and is not otherwise reasonably obtainable under this section or through other discovery authorized by the rules of the Commission.

The employer may communicate with the health care provider to request medical bills or a response to a pending written request, or about nonsubstantive administrative matters without the express authorization of the employee.

The Commission shall establish an appropriate fee to compensate health care providers for time spent communicating with the employer or employee. Each party shall bear its own costs for said communication.

No cause of action shall arise and no health care provider shall incur any liability as a result of the release of medical records, reports, or information pursuant to this Article.

For purposes of this section, the term “employer” means the employer, the employer’s attorney, and the employer’s insurance carrier or third-party administrator; and the term “employee” means the employee, legally appointed guardian, or any attorney representing the employee.

History.

2005-448, s. 6.1; 2011-287, s. 7; 2012-135, s. 2.

§ 97-26.
Fees allowed for medical treatment; malpractice of physician.

Fee Schedule. — The Commission shall adopt by rule a schedule of maximum fees for medical compensation and shall periodically review the schedule and make revisions.The fees adopted by the Commission in its schedule shall be adequate to ensure that (i) injured workers are provided the standard of services and care intended by this Chapter, (ii) providers are reimbursed reasonable fees for providing these services, and (iii) medical costs are adequately contained.The Commission may consider any and all reimbursement systems and plans in establishing its fee schedule, including, but not limited to, the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees (hereinafter, “State Plan”), Blue Cross and Blue Shield, and any other private or governmental plans. The Commission may also consider any and all reimbursement methodologies, including, but not limited to, the use of current procedural terminology (“CPT”) codes, diagnostic-related groupings (“DRGs”), per diem rates, capitated payments, and resource-based relative-value system (“RBRVS”) payments. The Commission may consider statewide fee averages, geographical and community variations in provider costs, and any other factors affecting provider costs.

Hospital Fees. — Each hospital subject to the provisions of this section shall be reimbursed the amount provided for in this section unless it has agreed under contract with the insurer, managed care organization, employer (or other payor obligated to reimburse for inpatient hospital services rendered under this Chapter) to accept a different amount or reimbursement methodology.The explanation of the fee schedule change that is published pursuant to G.S. 150B-21.2(c)(2) shall include a summary of the data and calculations on which the fee schedule rate is based.A hospital’s itemized charges on the UB-92 claim form for workers’ compensation services shall be the same as itemized charges for like services for all other payers.

Maximum Reimbursement for Providers Under Subsection (a). — Each health care provider subject to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall be reimbursed the amount specified under the fee schedule unless the provider has agreed under contract with the insurer or managed care organization to accept a different amount or reimbursement methodology. In any instance in which neither the fee schedule nor a contractual fee applies, the maximum reimbursement to which a provider under subsection (a) is entitled under this Article is the usual, customary, and reasonable charge for the service or treatment rendered. In no event shall a provider under subsection (a) charge more than its usual fee for the service or treatment rendered.

Information to Commission. — Each health care provider seeking reimbursement for medical compensation under this Article shall provide the Commission information requested by the Commission for the development of fee schedules and the determination of appropriate reimbursement.

When Charges Submitted. — Health care providers shall submit charges to the insurer or managed care organization within 30 days of treatment, within 30 days after the end of the month during which multiple treatments were provided, or within such other reasonable period of time as allowed by the Commission. If an insurer or managed care organization disputes a portion of a health care provider’s bill, it shall pay the uncontested portion of the bill and shall resolve disputes regarding the balance of the charges in accordance with this Article or its contractual arrangement.

Repeating Diagnostic Tests. — A health care provider shall not authorize a diagnostic test previously conducted by another provider, unless the health care provider has reasonable grounds to believe a change in patient condition may have occurred or the quality of the prior test is doubted. The Commission may adopt rules establishing reasonable requirements for reports and records to be made available to other health care providers to prevent unnecessary duplication of tests and examinations. A health care provider that violates this subsection shall not be reimbursed for the costs associated with administering or analyzing the test.

Direct Reimbursement. — The Commission may adopt rules to allow insurers and managed care organizations to review and reimburse charges for medical compensation without submitting the charges to the Commission for review and approval.

(g1)

Administrative Simplification. —

The applicable administrative standards for code sets, identifiers, formats, and electronic transactions to be used in processing electronic medical bills under this Article shall comply with 45 C.F.R. § 162. The Commission shall adopt rules to require electronic medical billing and payment processes, to standardize the necessary medical documentation for billing adjudication, to provide for effective dates and compliance, and for further implementation of this subsection.

Malpractice. — The employer shall not be liable in damages for malpractice by a physician or surgeon furnished by him pursuant to the provisions of this section, but the consequences of any such malpractice shall be deemed part of the injury resulting from the accident, and shall be compensated for as such.

Resolution of Dispute. — The employee or health care provider may apply to the Commission by motion or for a hearing to resolve any dispute regarding the payment of charges for medical compensation in accordance with this Article.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 26; 1955, c. 1026, s. 3; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 2.3; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 548, s. 1; 1997-145, s. 1; 2001-410, s. 3; 2001-413, s. 8.2(a); 2005-448, s. 5; 2007-323, s. 28.22A(o); 2007-345, s. 12; 2011-287, s. 8; 2012-135, s. 3; 2013-410, s. 33(b).

Industrial Commission Hospital Fee Schedule.

Session Laws 2013-410, s. 33(a), provides: “Industrial Commission Hospital Fee Schedule:

“(1) Medicare methodology for physician and hospital fee schedules. — With respect to the schedule of maximum fees for physician and hospital compensation adopted by the Industrial Commission pursuant to

G.S. 97-26

, those fee schedules shall be based on the applicable Medicare payment methodologies, with such adjustments and exceptions as are necessary and appropriate to ensure that (i) injured workers are provided the standard of services and care intended by Chapter 97 of the General Statutes, (ii) providers are reimbursed reasonable fees for providing these services, and (iii) medical costs are adequately contained. Such fee schedules shall also be periodically reviewed to ensure that they continue to adhere to these standards and applicable fee schedule requirements of Chapter 97. In addition to the statewide fee averages, geographical and community variations in provider costs, and other factors affecting provider costs that the Commission may consider pursuant to

G.S. 97-26

, the Commission may also consider other payment systems in North Carolina, other states’ cost and payment structures for workers’ compensation, the impact of changes over time to Medicare fee schedules on payers and providers, and cost issues for providers and payers relating to frequency of service, case mix index, and related issues.

“(2) Transition to direct billing. — Pursuant to G.S. 97-26(g) through (g1) and applicable rules, the Commission shall provide for transition to direct claims submission and reimbursement for medical and hospital fees, including an implementation timeline, notice to affected stakeholders, and related compliance issues.

“(3) Expedite rule-making process for fee schedule. — The Industrial Commission is exempt from the certification requirements of

G.S. 150B-19.1(h)

and the fiscal note requirement of

G.S. 150B-21.4

in developing the fee schedules required pursuant to this section.”

§ 97-26.1.
Fees for medical records and reports; expert witnesses; communications with health care providers.

The Commission may establish maximum fees for the following when related to a claim under this Article: (i) the searching, handling, copying, and mailing of medical records, (ii) the preparation of medical reports and narratives, (iii) the presentation of expert testimony in a Commission proceeding, and (iv) the time spent communicating with the employer or employee pursuant to G.S. 97-25.6(i).

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 5.6; 2012-135, s. 4.